Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.140

Recording private communications—Authorization of or application for—Inventory, contents, service—Availability of recording, applications, and orders.

Within a reasonable time but not later than thirty days after the termination of the period of the authorization or of extensions or renewals thereof, or the date of the denial of an authorization applied for under RCW 9.73.090 as now or hereafter amended, the issuing authority shall cause to be served on the person named in the authorization or application for an authorization, and such other parties to the recorded communications as the judge may in his or her discretion determine to be in the interest of justice, an inventory which shall include:

(1) Notice of the entry of the authorization or the application for an authorization which has been denied under RCW 9.73.090 as now or hereafter amended;

(2) The date of the entry of the authorization or the denial of an authorization applied for under RCW 9.73.090 as now or hereafter amended;

(3) The period of authorized or disapproved recording; and

(4) The fact that during the period wire or oral communications were or were not recorded.

The issuing authority, upon the filing of a motion, may in its discretion make available to such person or his or her attorney for inspection such portions of the recorded communications, applications and orders as the court determines to be in the interest of justice. On an ex parte showing of good cause to the court the serving of the inventory required by this section may be postponed or dispensed with.

[ 2011 c 336 s 327; 1977 ex.s. c 363 s 7.]